Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-704
Revisor of Statutes; printing contracts; approval; number of volumes.

(1) The Revisor of Statutes may, subject to the approval of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, negotiate and enter into a contract without advertising for bids for the editing, printing, binding, and publication, under the Revisor's supervision and direction, of the supplements and reissued or replacement volumes to the statutes of Nebraska.

(2) The Revisor of Statutes shall cause a sufficient number of copies of such volumes to be printed under contract according to specifications to be formulated by the Revisor of Statutes after taking into consideration the requests made pursuant to the policy described in section 49-601.

Laws 1945, c. 119, § 4, p. 393;

Laws 1967, c. 328, § 5, p. 870;

Laws 1971, LB 34, § 1;

Laws 1977, LB 8, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1236, § 14.
January 1, 2027